test/src/morphology/N-kim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kim: # Noun 126 'eng /est kümme/fin' - full paradigm
     kim+N+Sg+Nom: kim
     kim+N+Sg+Gen: kim
     kim+N+Sg+Par: kimmõ
     kim+N+Sg+Dat: kimmõn
     kim+N+Sg+Ins: kimmõks
     kim+N+Sg+Ill: kimmõ
     kim+N+Sg+Ela: kimstõ
     kim+N+Pl+Nom: kimmõd
     kim+N+Pl+Gen: kimmõd
     kim+N+Pl+Par: kimmidi
     kim+N+Pl+Dat: kimmõdõn
     kim+N+Pl+Ins: kimmõdõks
     kim+N+Pl+Ill: kimmiž
     kim+N+Pl+Ela: kimmist
